Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB700.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1501-N of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1501-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Core curriculum." The curriculum for English language arts that is adopted for tier 1 instruction to all students.* * *"Parent." An individual who has legal custody or guardianship of a student.* * *Section 2. Section 1502-N of the act, added October 31, 2024 (P.L.1129, No.135), is amended to read:Section 1502-N. Evidence-based reading instruction curriculum.(a) Department duties and expiration.--(1) The department shall develop a process for a vendor to submit an evidence-based reading instruction curriculum for review by the department, in consultation with the council, for inclusion on the list developed and maintained under paragraph (2).(2) By June 1, 2025, the department shall develop and maintain a list of evidence-based reading instruction curricula [that meets] for use in school entities. A curriculum on this list must meet all of the following requirements:(i) [The curricula shall be] Be aligned with the Commonwealth's academic standards and the science of reading.(ii) [The curricula shall include] Include a logical scope and sequence for implementing curriculum that is systematic and cumulative.(3) The department shall maintain all of the following on the department's publicly accessible Internet website:(i) The current list of curricula under paragraph (2).20250SB0700PN0714 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The criteria and rubrics used to identify high-quality curriculum under paragraph (2) and to approve universal reading screeners under [subsection (b)] section 1503-N(d)(1). The criteria and rubrics must be developed in consultation with the council.(4) The department shall provide a process through which a school entity can submit an application for additional curriculum that meets the requirements under paragraph (2) for inclusion on the list developed and maintained by the department under paragraph (2).(5) The department shall establish a reading leadership council that shall advise the department on the development and maintenance of the list of reading instruction curricula [that meets the requirements] required under paragraph (2), a list of structured literacy professional development training programs that successfully meet the essential content requirements in section 1205.8(c)(1), the list of universal reading screeners and the list of structured literacy intervention approaches [that meets the requirements under subsection (b)] required under section 1503-N(d)(1). The following shall apply:(i) The council shall have 20 members appointed by the department who have expertise in structured literacy and shall include public school elementary school staff, including the following:(A) Primary classroom teachers in kindergarten through third grade.(B) Reading specialists.(C) Literacy coaches.(D) Elementary special education teachers.20250SB0700PN0714 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) A learning support employee with experience working with subgroups as defined in the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802).(ii) Membership on the council shall reflect geographic representation of school districts, including diversity of district types, including rural, urban and suburban.(iii) The council shall meet at least once every two months at dates and times determined by the department. Meetings of the council shall be held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(iv) In performing its work, the council may consult with other professionals and nonprofit organizations with expertise in structured literacy.(v) The council's final recommendations shall be published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and submitted to [the following:(A) The Governor.(B) The State Board of Education.(C) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(D) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(E) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(F) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives] each of the recipients listed under section 1509-N(d).(5.1) By December 1, 2025, the department shall collect and post on the department's publicly accessible Internet 20250SB0700PN0714 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 website a disaggregated list of school entities that:(i) have adopted an evidence-based reading instruction curriculum under paragraph (2);(ii) are using reading screeners under section 1503- N(d)(1); or(iii) are undergoing or have completed a structured literacy professional development training program under paragraph (5).(6) This subsection shall expire [five] ten years from the effective date of this paragraph.[(b) List of screeners.--(1) The department, in consultation with the council, shall develop, maintain and publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a list of universal reading screeners and a list of structured literacy intervention approaches that are aligned with the essential components of evidence-based reading instruction, including phonemic awareness, decoding, encoding, fluency, vocabulary and comprehension. Initial publication of the lists must occur by June 1, 2025.(2) In determining which universal reading screeners to include on the list, the department shall consider the following factors:(i) The time required to conduct the screening, with the intention of minimizing impact on instructional time.(ii) The timeliness in reporting screening results to teachers, administrators and parents.(iii) The integration of assessment and feedback the screener provides, including the ability to provide progress monitoring capabilities and a diagnostic tool to 20250SB0700PN0714 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 support teachers or a progress monitoring team with targeted instruction based on student needs.(3) The department shall provide professional development on reading screening and literacy intervention approaches at no cost to a school entity or an educator. The professional development shall be provided during the contractual school day, inclusive of in-service days and other designated professional development days as provided for in the school entity's collective bargaining agreement. If insufficient professional development days are available, the professional development shall be provided through a separate agreement between a school entity and an employee organization at no cost to the school entity or the educator.](c) School entity duties.-- (1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity shall:(i) Approve a professional development training program for educators providing reading instruction or coaching from the list created under section 1502-N(a)(5) that satisfies the requirements under section 1205.8(c). The professional development shall be provided during the contractual day, inclusive of in-service days and other designated professional development days as provided for in the school entity's collective bargaining agreement. If insufficient professional development days are available, the professional development shall be provided through a separate agreement between a school entity and an employee organization at no cost to the school entity or the educator. An educator must complete approved 20250SB0700PN0714 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional development training no later than the beginning of the 2028-2029 school year.(ii) Ensure students in kindergarten through grade three who are identified for reading deficiencies are provided intervention plans that comply with the provisions of sections 1503-N and 1504-N.(2) No later than the 2030-2031 school year, each school entity shall adopt an evidence-based reading instruction curriculum and shall identify an educator responsible for assisting in each school with the implementation of the adopted curriculum. A school entity that adopts or renews reading instruction curriculum after the effective date of this paragraph shall adopt an evidence-based reading instruction curriculum.Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1503-N. Reading screening.(a) Duty.--Beginning July 1, 2026, a school entity shall screen each student enrolled in kindergarten through grade three for reading competency three times each school year, once at the beginning of the school year, once during the middle of the school year and once at the end of the school year. In conducting the screening, the school entity shall use a universal reading screener chosen from the list of approved universal reading screeners under subsection (d).(b) Time and coverage.--A school entity shall provide educators time during the contractual school day to complete data entry and compilation associated with the screener to communicate with families and carry out any other responsibility required under this section. Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and 20250SB0700PN0714 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procedures afforded to school employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between a school employer and an exclusive representative of the employees in accordance with the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.(c) Exception.--Students with limited English proficiency, students with disabilities and gifted students are subject to the requirements of this section except if the assessment would conflict with the educational program, plan or service agreement provided in accordance with Federal or State law and regulation.(d) List of screeners.--(1) The department, in consultation with the council, shall develop, maintain and publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a list of universal reading screeners and a list of structured literacy intervention approaches that are aligned with the essential components of evidence-based reading instruction, including phonemic awareness, decoding, encoding, fluency, vocabulary and comprehension. Initial publication of the lists must occur by June 1, 2025.(2) In determining which universal reading screeners to include on the list, the department shall consider the following factors:(i) The time required to conduct the screening, with the intention of minimizing impact on instructional time.(ii) The timeliness in reporting screening results to teachers, administrators and parents.(iii) The integration of assessment and feedback the screener provides, including the ability to provide 20250SB0700PN0714 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 progress monitoring capabilities and a diagnostic tool to support teachers or a progress monitoring team with targeted instruction based on student needs.(3) The department shall provide professional development on reading screening and literacy intervention approaches at no cost to a school entity or an educator. The professional development shall be provided during the contractual day, inclusive of in-service days and other designated professional development days as provided for in the school entity's collective bargaining agreement. If insufficient professional development days are available, the professional development shall be provided through a separate agreement between a school entity and an employee organization at no cost to the school entity or the educator.Section 1504-N. Reading deficiency and identification.(a) Student.--A student in kindergarten through grade three shall be identified as having a reading deficiency if an approved universal reading screener administered under section 1503-N identifies the student at risk for reading failure.(b) Reading deficiency.--A student who is identified as having a reading deficiency under this section shall remain identified as having a reading deficiency until the student performs at or above an identified threshold level using at least three data points, which may include results on a universal reading screener, the educator's professional judgment on a student's performance, progress monitoring outcomes, diagnostic assessments, benchmark assessments and formative or summative assessments.(c) Construction.--Nothing under this article shall prohibit a school entity from identifying a student in another grade 20250SB0700PN0714 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 level as being in need of reading interventions.Section 1505-N. School entity duties and reading intervention plan.(a) School entity.--A school entity shall offer a reading intervention plan to each student in kindergarten through grade three who is identified as having a reading deficiency under section 1504-N with the goal of ensuring that the student can read at or above grade level by the end of grade three.(b) Development.--The reading intervention plan shall be developed by an educator.(c) Plan.--The reading intervention plan shall, at a minimum, include reading intervention approaches and be provided in addition to what is provided to each student in the general education classroom and evidence-based reading instruction curriculum.Section 1506-N. Parent notification.The following shall apply:(1) Each parent of a kindergarten student who exhibits a deficiency in reading in the third screening at the end of the school year must be notified in writing or by electronic communication.(2) Each parent of a student in grades one through three who exhibits a deficiency in reading during the school year must be notified in writing or by electronic communication after the identification of the reading deficiency, including periodic updates three times per year regarding the student's progress.Section 1507-N. Grants to school entities.(a) Establishment.--The department shall establish a grant program to aid school entities with initial costs associated 20250SB0700PN0714 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with training and other resources necessary to implement this article. School entities that have satisfied the requirements under section 1502-N(c) by adopting programs and curricula from lists created under section 1502-N(a)(5) shall be eligible for grant funding. The total amount of grants awarded shall be limited to funds appropriated for this purpose under section 1508-N.(b) Application.--The department shall develop an application form that school entities shall use to apply for a grant under the program. Grant applications shall be submitted in accordance with guidelines developed by the department.Section 1508-N. Funding.(a) Restricted account.--The Evidence-based Reading Instruction Restricted Account is established as a restricted account within the General Fund.(b) Use.--The department shall use the money in the Evidence-based Reading Instruction Restricted Account to award grants to school entities in accordance with section 1507-N.(c) Funding.--Money in the restricted account shall remain in the account and shall only be used for the purposes stated in this article. The account shall be funded from: (1) Appropriations from the General Assembly. (2) Funds from the Federal Government. (3) Funding from other public and private sources. Section 1509-N. Reporting.(a) School entity report.--Beginning October 31, 2026, and each October 31 thereafter, each school entity shall report annually to the department the following:(1) The number and percentage of students, disaggregated by grade and by individual school, identified with a 20250SB0700PN0714 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 potential reading deficiency at the beginning of the school year pursuant to the first screening of the school year required under section 1503-N and the literacy intervention approaches being provided.(2) The number and percentage of students, disaggregated by grade and by individual school, identified with a potential reading deficiency at the end of the school year pursuant to the final screening of the school year required under section 1503-N.(3) The number of students, disaggregated by grade and by individual school, excepted from the assessment under section 1503-N(c).(4) The evidence-based reading instruction curricula adopted by each school entity under this article.(5) The number of educators in the school entity who have received professional development under section 1502-N(c)(1)(i) and the type of professional development received.(b) Department report.--Beginning December 31, 2026, and each December 31 thereafter, the department shall produce an annual report that provides the information reported to the department under subsection (a).(c) Report data.--Data included in the report shall be de-identified and comply with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 90-247, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g).(d) Recipients.--The department shall publish the report required under this section on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and submit the report to each of the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The State Board of Education.20250SB0700PN0714 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(4) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0700PN0714 - 13 - 1234567